Utah statutes.
10-1-111.   Existing indebtedness.
Any bond or other evidence of indebtedness issued under the provisions of any
act repealed by this act which is outstanding and unpaid as of July 1, 1977,
shall be amortized and retired by taxation or revenue in the manner provided
by the act under which such indebtedness was incurred, notwithstanding repeal
or change of the act.
